Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 7
SEPARATE TRIAL - ARRAIGNMENT - PLEA AGREEMENTS -
DEFERRED PROSECUTION AND DEFERRED SENTENCING

Editor's note:

This article was repealed and reenacted in 1972. For historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment, see the editor's note before the article 1 heading.

Section

PART 1 SEPARATE TRIAL - ALIBI NOTICE

PART 2 ARRAIGNMENT

PART 3 PLEA DISCUSSIONS
AND PLEA AGREEMENTS

PART 4 DEFERRED PROSECUTION
AND DEFERRED SENTENCING